Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2206 DIVISION I 1 MARIJUANA ââ CRIMINAL PENALTIES 2 Section 1. Section 124.401, subsection 1, unnumbered 3 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 Except as authorized by this chapter , chapter 124E, or 5 chapter 124F , it is unlawful for any person to manufacture, 6 deliver, or possess with the intent to manufacture or deliver, 7 a controlled substance, a counterfeit substance, a simulated 8 controlled substance, or an imitation controlled substance, 9 or to act with, enter into a common scheme or design with, 10 or conspire with one or more other persons to manufacture, 11 deliver, or possess with the intent to manufacture or deliver 12 a controlled substance, a counterfeit substance, a simulated 13 controlled substance, or an imitation controlled substance. 14 Sec. 2. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph a, 15 subparagraph (6), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 16 subparagraph. 17 Sec. 3. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph b, 18 subparagraph (6), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 19 subparagraph. 20 Sec. 4. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph c, 21 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 22 subparagraph. 23 Sec. 5. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph c, 24 subparagraph (9), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 25 (9) Any other controlled substance, counterfeit substance, 26 simulated controlled substance, or imitation controlled 27 substance classified in schedule I, II, or III, except as 28 provided in paragraph âdâ , chapter 124E, or chapter 124F . 29 Sec. 6. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 d. Violation of this subsection , with respect to any other 32 controlled substances, counterfeit substances, simulated 33 controlled substances, or imitation controlled substances 34 classified in schedule IV or V is an aggravated misdemeanor. 35 -1- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 1/ 50 H.F. 2206 However, violation of this subsection involving fifty kilograms 1 or less of marijuana or involving flunitrazepam is a class âDâ 2 felony. 3 Sec. 7. Section 124.401, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 b. If the controlled substance is marijuana, the punishment 6 shall be by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 7 six months or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, 8 or by both such fine and imprisonment for a first offense. If 9 the controlled substance is marijuana and the person has been 10 previously convicted of a violation of this subsection in which 11 the controlled substance was marijuana, the punishment shall be 12 as provided in section 903.1, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ . If 13 the controlled substance is marijuana and the person has been 14 previously convicted two or more times of a violation of this 15 subsection in which the controlled substance was marijuana, 16 the person is guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. This 17 subsection does not apply to the possession of marijuana which 18 is punishable pursuant to chapter 124F. 19 Sec. 8. Section 124.401G, Code 2026, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 124.401G Iowa hemp Act. 22 Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the 23 contrary, a person shall not be guilty of an offense under 24 this chapter , including under section 124.401 or 124.410 , 25 for producing, possessing, using, harvesting, handling, 26 manufacturing, marketing, transporting, delivering, or 27 distributing the plant cannabis, to the extent that the person 28 is a USDA licensee acting in accordance with the federal hemp 29 law, as those terms are defined in chapter 204A . 30 Sec. 9. Section 124.407, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. a. Any person who violates this section , and where the 33 controlled substance is any one a controlled substance other 34 than marijuana , is guilty of a class âDâ felony. 35 -2- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 2/ 50 H.F. 2206 b. Any person who violates this section , and where the 1 controlled substance is marijuana only, is guilty of a serious 2 misdemeanor. 3 Sec. 10. Section 124.411, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 2. For purposes of this section , an offense is considered 6 a second or subsequent offense, if, prior to the personâs 7 having been convicted of the offense, the offender has ever 8 been convicted under this chapter or under any state or federal 9 statute relating to narcotic drugs or cocaine, marijuana, 10 depressant, stimulant, or hallucinogenic drugs. 11 Sec. 11. Section 124.413, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 2. This section shall not apply if : 14 a. The offense is found to be an accommodation pursuant to 15 section 124.410 ; or 16 b. The the controlled substance is marijuana. 17 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 124F.1 Definitions. 18 As used in this subchapter: 19 1. âCounterfeit substanceâ means the same as defined in 20 section 124.101. 21 2. âImitation controlled substanceâ means the same as 22 defined in section 124.101. 23 3. âMarijuanaâ means the same as defined in section 124.101, 24 and includes a counterfeit substance, imitation controlled 25 substance, or simulated controlled substance containing a 26 detectable amount of marijuana. 27 4. âSimulated controlled substanceâ means the same as 28 defined in section 124.101. 29 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 124F.2 Marijuana ââ penalties. 30 1. a. Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter and 31 chapter 124E, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture, 32 deliver, or possess with the intent to manufacture or deliver 33 marijuana, or to act with, enter into a common scheme or 34 design with, or conspire with one or more other persons to 35 -3- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 3/ 50 H.F. 2206 manufacture, deliver, or possess with the intent to manufacture 1 or deliver marijuana. A violation of this subsection involving 2 the following amounts of marijuana shall be punishable as 3 follows: 4 (1) More than fifty kilograms shall be a class âCâ felony. 5 (2) More than two kilograms but not more than fifty 6 kilograms shall be a class âDâ felony. 7 (3) More than twelve ounces but not more than two kilograms 8 shall be an aggravated misdemeanor. 9 (4) More than four ounces but not more than twelve ounces 10 shall be punishable as a serious misdemeanor. 11 (5) Four ounces or less shall be punishable as a simple 12 misdemeanor, except as provided in section 124F.3. 13 b. In addition to any other penalties provided in this 14 subsection, a person who is eighteen years of age or older 15 who unlawfully manufactures with the intent to distribute, 16 distributes, or possesses with the intent to distribute 17 marijuana to another person who is eighteen years of age or 18 older in or on, or within one thousand feet of, the real 19 property comprising a public or private elementary or secondary 20 school, public park, public swimming pool, public recreation 21 center, or on a marked school bus, may be sentenced up to an 22 additional term of confinement of five years. 23 2. It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally 24 to possess marijuana unless such substance was obtained 25 directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of 26 a practitioner while acting in the course of the practitionerâs 27 professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by 28 this subsection. A violation of this subsection involving 29 the possession of the following amounts of marijuana shall be 30 punishable as follows: 31 a. More than six ounces but not more than twelve ounces is 32 a serious misdemeanor. 33 b. More than one-half ounce but not more than six ounces is 34 a simple misdemeanor. 35 -4- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 4/ 50 H.F. 2206 c. One-half ounce or less is not a criminal offense but 1 shall be assessed as a civil penalty in the amount of one 2 hundred dollars, except if the person is under twenty-one years 3 of age, the person shall complete a drug awareness program and 4 ten hours of unpaid community service, and shall notify the 5 personâs parents or legal guardian. 6 (1) The civil penalty shall be collected by the clerk of the 7 district court pursuant to section 602.8105, subsection 5. 8 (2) Any records relating to the civil penalty shall not 9 be displayed for public viewing on the Iowa court information 10 system. 11 (3) Any records relating to the civil penalty shall not 12 be kept in the criminal history data files maintained by the 13 department of public safety. Any records relating to the civil 14 penalty shall not be disseminated to other criminal or juvenile 15 justice agencies. 16 3. a. A retail marijuana store shall not sell retail 17 marijuana in excess of the following amounts in a single 18 transaction: 19 (1) Thirty grams of marijuana flower. 20 (2) Five hundred milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol 21 contained in a product infused with marijuana. 22 b. A person shall not possess more than five ounces of 23 marijuana flower. 24 c. A person in possession of retail marijuana in excess of 25 the amounts specified in paragraph âaâ equivalent to the amounts 26 specified in subsection 2, shall be subject to the penalties in 27 subsection 2. 28 d. A retail marijuana store in violation of this subsection 29 shall be subject to licensee discipline pursuant to section 30 124F.16. 31 e. For purposes of this subsection, âretail marijuanaâ and 32 âretail marijuana storeâ mean the same as defined in section 33 124F.4. 34 4. a. Upon the expiration of two years following a 35 -5- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 5/ 50 H.F. 2206 conviction for a violation of subsection 2, paragraph âaâ or 1 âbâ , a person may petition the court to expunge the conviction, 2 and if the person has had no other criminal convictions, other 3 than local traffic violations or simple misdemeanor violations 4 of chapter 321 during the two-year period, the conviction 5 shall be expunged as a matter of law. The court shall enter 6 an order that the record of the conviction be expunged by the 7 clerk of the district court. Notwithstanding section 692.2, 8 after receipt of notice from the clerk of the district court 9 that a record of conviction has been expunged pursuant to this 10 subsection, the record of conviction shall be removed from the 11 criminal history data files maintained by the department of 12 public safety. 13 b. On the effective date of this Act, each court shall 14 review its records to identify persons who have been convicted 15 of an offense based on conduct allowed under this Act. Each 16 such conviction shall be expunged as a matter of law as 17 provided in paragraph âaâ . 18 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 124F.3 Juvenile offenses. 19 The juvenile court shall have exclusive original 20 jurisdiction in a proceeding concerning a minor who is alleged 21 to have committed a violation of this subchapter. 22 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 321.284B Marijuana in motor vehicles. 23 1. A driver of a motor vehicle upon a public street or 24 highway shall not use marijuana in the passenger area of the 25 motor vehicle. âPassenger areaâ means the area designed to 26 seat the driver and passengers while the motor vehicle is in 27 operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver 28 or a passenger while in their seating positions, including the 29 glove compartment. 30 2. A driver or passenger of or in a motor vehicle upon a 31 public street or highway shall not possess marijuana in the 32 passenger area of a motor vehicle except in a sealed, odor 33 proof, child resistant container. 34 3. For the purposes of this section, âmarijuanaâ means the 35 -6- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 6/ 50 H.F. 2206 same as defined in section 124.401. 1 4. A person who knowingly violates a provision of this 2 section is guilty of a simple misdemeanor. 3 Sec. 16. Section 321J.2, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 c. While Except as provided in section 321J.2C, any amount 6 of a controlled substance is present in the person, as measured 7 in the personâs blood or urine. 8 Sec. 17. NEW SECTION . 321J.2C Operating while under the 9 influence of marijuana. 10 1. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle in this state 11 while having fifty nanograms of tetrahydrocannabinol in the 12 person, as measured in the personâs blood. 13 2. A person who violates subsection 1 is guilty of a serious 14 misdemeanor, punishable as follows: 15 a. For a first offense, revocation of the personâs driverâs 16 license for a period of one hundred eighty days, except that if 17 the person refused to submit to chemical testing, the personâs 18 driverâs license shall be revoked for a period of one year. 19 b. For a second or subsequent offense, revocation of the 20 personâs driverâs license for a period of one year, except 21 that if the person refused to submit to chemical testing, the 22 personâs driverâs license shall be revoked for a period of two 23 years. 24 Sec. 18. Section 602.8105, Code 2026, is amended by adding 25 the following new subsection: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The clerk of the district court shall 27 collect the civil penalty assessed pursuant to section 124F.2, 28 subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (1). 29 Sec. 19. NEW SECTION . 901C.4 Felony offenses related to 30 marijuana ââ expungement. 31 1. In addition to the expungement provisions available 32 to a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor marijuana offense 33 under chapter 124, upon application of a defendant convicted 34 of a felony offense under chapter 124 in the county where the 35 -7- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 7/ 50 H.F. 2206 conviction occurred, related to the possession or transfer of 1 marijuana, the court shall enter an order expunging the record 2 of such a criminal case. 3 2. A person shall be granted an expungement of a record 4 under this section one time in the personâs lifetime. However, 5 the one application may request the expungement of records 6 relating to more than one nonviolent offense under this section 7 if the offenses arose from the same transaction or occurrence, 8 and the application contains the offenses to be expunged. 9 3. The expunged record under this section is a confidential 10 record exempt from public access under section 22.7 but shall 11 be made available by the clerk of the district court upon court 12 order. 13 4. Notwithstanding section 692.2, after receipt of 14 notice from the clerk of the district court that a record of 15 conviction has been expunged under subsection 1, the record 16 of conviction shall be removed from the criminal history data 17 files maintained by the department of public safety if such a 18 record was maintained in the criminal history data files. 19 5. The supreme court may prescribe rules governing the 20 procedures applicable to the expungement of a criminal case 21 under this section. 22 6. This section applies to a felony conviction that occurred 23 prior to January 1, 2027. 24 Sec. 20. REPEAL. Section 124.410, Code 2026, is repealed. 25 DIVISION II 26 RETAIL MARIJUANA 27 Sec. 21. NEW SECTION . 124F.4 Definitions. 28 For the purposes of this subchapter: 29 1. âDivisionâ means the division of the department of 30 revenue responsible for the issuance of alcohol licenses. 31 2. âImmature plantâ means a nonflowering marijuana plant 32 that is no taller than eight inches and no wider than eight 33 inches, is produced from a cutting, clipping, or seedling, and 34 is in a cultivating container. 35 -8- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 8/ 50 H.F. 2206 3. âLicenseâ means a license or registration issued pursuant 1 to this subchapter. 2 4. âLicensed premisesâ means the premises specified in an 3 application for a license under this subchapter, which are 4 owned or in possession of the licensee and within which the 5 licensee is authorized to cultivate, manufacture, distribute, 6 sell, or test retail marijuana and retail marijuana products in 7 accordance with this subchapter. 8 5. âLicenseeâ means a person licensed or registered pursuant 9 to this subchapter. 10 6. âLocal jurisdictionâ means a county. 11 7. âLocal licensing authorityâ means, for any local 12 jurisdiction that has chosen to adopt a local licensing 13 requirement in addition to the state licensing requirements 14 of this subchapter, an authority designated by a municipal 15 or county ordinance, or resolution, or the governing body of 16 a municipality or county, or the board of commissioners of a 17 county if no such authority is designated. 18 8. âLocationâ means a particular parcel of land that may be 19 identified by an address or other descriptive means. 20 9. âMarijuanaâ means the same as defined in section 124.101. 21 10. âMarijuana accessoriesâ means any equipment, products, 22 or materials of any kind which are used, intended for use, or 23 designed for use in planting, cultivating, growing, harvesting, 24 composting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, 25 processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, 26 repackaging, storing, vaporizing, or containing marijuana, or 27 for ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana 28 into the human body. 29 11. âPersonâ means a natural person, partnership, 30 association, company, corporation, limited liability company, 31 or organization; except that âpersonâ does not include any 32 governmental organization. 33 12. âRetail marijuanaâ means all parts of the plant of the 34 genus Cannabis, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof; the 35 -9- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 9/ 50 H.F. 2206 resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, 1 manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the 2 plant, its seeds or resin, including marijuana concentrate. 3 âRetail marijuanaâ does not include industrial hemp, nor does 4 it include fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made 5 from the seeds of the plant, sterilized seeds of the plant 6 which are incapable of germination, or the weight of any other 7 ingredient combined with marijuana to prepare topical or oral 8 administrations, food, drink, or other product. 9 13. âRetail marijuana cultivation facilityâ means an entity 10 licensed to cultivate, prepare, package, and sell marijuana to 11 retail marijuana stores, to marijuana product manufacturing 12 facilities, and to other marijuana cultivation facilities, but 13 not to consumers. 14 14. âRetail marijuana establishmentâ means a retail 15 marijuana store, a retail marijuana cultivation facility, or a 16 retail marijuana products manufacturer. 17 15. âRetail marijuana productsâ means concentrated marijuana 18 products and marijuana products that are comprised of marijuana 19 and other ingredients and are intended for use or consumption, 20 such as but not limited to edible products, ointments, and 21 tinctures. 22 16. âRetail marijuana products manufacturerâ means an entity 23 licensed to purchase marijuana; manufacture, prepare, and 24 package marijuana products; and sell marijuana and marijuana 25 products to other marijuana product manufacturing facilities 26 and to retail marijuana stores, but not to consumers. 27 17. âRetail marijuana storeâ means an entity licensed 28 to purchase marijuana from marijuana cultivation facilities 29 and sell marijuana and to purchase marijuana products from 30 retail marijuana product manufacturing facilities and to sell 31 marijuana and marijuana products to consumers. 32 18. âRetail marijuana transporterâ means an entity or person 33 licensed to transport retail marijuana and retail marijuana 34 products from one retail marijuana establishment to another 35 -10- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 10/ 50 H.F. 2206 retail marijuana establishment and to temporarily store the 1 transported retail marijuana and retail marijuana products at 2 its licensed premises, but is not authorized to sell retail 3 marijuana or retail marijuana products under any circumstances. 4 Sec. 22. NEW SECTION . 124F.5 Applicability. 5 1. On or after July 1, 2027, an applicant may apply for 6 licensure of a retail marijuana establishment pursuant to this 7 subchapter. 8 2. a. Pursuant to subsection 1, an applicant shall complete 9 forms as provided by the division and shall pay the application 10 fee and the licensing fee. The division shall forward, within 11 seven days of the date of the application, one-half of the 12 application fee to the local jurisdiction unless the local 13 jurisdiction has prohibited the operation of retail marijuana 14 establishments. If the license is denied, the division shall 15 refund the licensing fee to the applicant. 16 b. The division shall act upon an application made pursuant 17 to subsection 1 no sooner than forty-five days and no later 18 than ninety days after the date of the application. The 19 division shall process applications in the order in which 20 completed applications are received by the division. 21 3. a. Any local jurisdiction may enact ordinances or 22 regulations governing the time, place, manner, and number of 23 retail marijuana establishments, which may include a local 24 licensing requirement, or may prohibit the operation of retail 25 marijuana establishments by ordinance or by a referred or 26 initiated measure. If a county acts through an initiated 27 measure, the proponents shall submit a petition signed by not 28 less than fifteen percent of the registered electors in the 29 county. 30 b. If a county prohibits the operation of retail marijuana 31 establishments, the county shall, upon receipt of a petition 32 signed by fifteen percent of the registered voters in the 33 county, submit to the voters of the county the question of 34 whether the operation of retail marijuana establishments should 35 -11- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 11/ 50 H.F. 2206 be allowed in the county at the next general election. 1 Sec. 23. NEW SECTION . 124F.6 Retail marijuana licensure. 2 1. The division shall develop and maintain a seed-to-sale 3 tracking system that tracks retail marijuana from either 4 seed or immature plant stage until the marijuana or retail 5 marijuana product is sold to a customer at a retail marijuana 6 establishment to ensure that no marijuana grown or processed 7 by a retail marijuana establishment is sold or otherwise 8 transferred except by a retail marijuana store. 9 2. The division shall adopt all rules necessary for the 10 implementation of this chapter. 11 3. Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to be 12 a delegation to the division of the power to fix prices for 13 retail marijuana. 14 4. Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to limit 15 a law enforcement agencyâs ability to investigate unlawful 16 activity in relation to a retail marijuana establishment. A 17 law enforcement agency shall have the authority to conduct a 18 criminal history record check of a licensee and an employee of 19 a licensee during an investigation of unlawful activity related 20 to retail marijuana and retail marijuana products. 21 5. The division shall create a statewide licensure class 22 system for retail marijuana cultivation facilities. The 23 classifications may be based upon square footage of the 24 facility; lights, lumens, or wattage; canopy lighting; the 25 number of cultivating plants; a combination of the foregoing; 26 or other reasonable metrics. The division shall create a fee 27 structure for the licensure class system. 28 Sec. 24. NEW SECTION . 124F.7 State and local participation 29 in licensure. 30 1. When the division receives an application for an 31 initial license or a renewal of an existing license for 32 any retail marijuana establishment, the division shall 33 provide, within seven days of receipt of an application, 34 a copy of the application to the local jurisdiction in 35 -12- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 12/ 50 H.F. 2206 which the establishment is to be located unless the local 1 jurisdiction has prohibited the operation of retail marijuana 2 establishments. The local jurisdiction shall determine whether 3 the application complies with local restrictions relating 4 to time, place, manner, and the number of retail marijuana 5 establishments allowed. The local jurisdiction shall inform 6 the division whether the application complies with local 7 restrictions. 8 2. A local jurisdiction may impose a separate local 9 licensing requirement as a part of its restrictions relating 10 to time, place, manner, and the number of retail marijuana 11 establishments allowed. A local jurisdiction may decline 12 to impose any local licensing requirements, but a local 13 jurisdiction shall notify the division that it either approves 14 or denies each application received by the local jurisdiction. 15 3. If a local jurisdiction issues a local license for 16 a retail marijuana establishment, a local jurisdiction may 17 schedule a public hearing on the application. If the local 18 jurisdiction schedules a hearing, it shall post and publish 19 public notice of the hearing not less than ten days prior 20 to the hearing. The local jurisdiction shall give public 21 notice by posting a sign in a conspicuous place on the license 22 applicantâs premises for which a local license application 23 has been made and by publication in a newspaper of general 24 circulation in the county in which the applicantâs premises are 25 located. 26 4. If a local jurisdiction does not issue local licenses, 27 the local jurisdiction may give public notice of the state 28 license application by posting a sign in a conspicuous place 29 on the state license applicantâs premises for which a state 30 license application has been made and by publication in a 31 newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the 32 applicantâs premises are located. 33 5. Applications for a state license under this subchapter 34 must be made to the division on forms prepared and furnished 35 -13- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 13/ 50 H.F. 2206 by the division and must set forth such information as the 1 division may require to enable the division to determine 2 whether a state license should be granted. 3 6. The division shall deny a state license if the premises 4 on which the applicant proposes to conduct its business does 5 not meet the requirements of this subchapter. The division 6 may refuse or deny a license renewal, reinstatement, or 7 initial license issuance for good cause. For purposes of this 8 subsection, âgood causeâ means any of the following: 9 a. The licensee or applicant has violated, does not meet, 10 or has failed to comply with any of the terms, conditions, or 11 provisions of this subchapter, any rules promulgated pursuant 12 to this subchapter, or any supplemental local law, rules, or 13 regulations. 14 b. The licensee or applicant has failed to comply with any 15 special terms or conditions of the license pursuant to an order 16 of the division or local licensing authority. 17 c. The licensed premises have been operated in a manner that 18 adversely affects the public health or safety of the immediate 19 neighborhood in which the retail marijuana establishment is 20 located. 21 d. The licensed premises are located within two thousand 22 feet of real property comprising a school, child care facility, 23 or public park. 24 7. If the division denies a state license pursuant to 25 subsection 6, the applicant shall be entitled to a hearing 26 pursuant to section 17A.12 and judicial review pursuant to 27 section 17A.19. The division shall provide written notice of 28 the grounds for denial of the state license to the applicant 29 and to the local jurisdiction at least fifteen days prior to 30 the hearing. 31 8. The division shall give primary preference to applicants 32 for licensure who are currently licensed as a medical 33 cannabidiol manufacturer or medical cannabidiol dispensary 34 pursuant to chapter 124E. The division shall also prioritize 35 -14- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 14/ 50 H.F. 2206 applicants for licensure that are businesses that are 1 majority-owned by persons who are women, citizens or permanent 2 legal residents of Iowa, or disabled veterans. 3 9. The division shall issue licenses to businesses that 4 are majority-owned by persons who are racial minorities in a 5 proportion that meets or exceeds the percentage of persons in 6 this state who are racial minorities according to the most 7 recent federal decennial census. 8 Sec. 25. NEW SECTION . 124F.8 Establishment and owner 9 requirements. 10 1. An owner who is a natural person must have been either 11 of the following: 12 a. A resident of Iowa for at least one year prior to the 13 date of the application. 14 b. A United States citizen prior to the date of the 15 application. 16 2. A retail marijuana establishment may be composed of an 17 unlimited number of owners that have been residents of Iowa for 18 at least one year prior to the date of the application. 19 3. A retail marijuana establishment shall not interfere 20 with the creation of or participation in a labor organization, 21 as defined in section 216.2, by employees of the retail 22 marijuana establishment. 23 4. The division shall review the retail marijuana 24 establishmentâs operating documents to ensure compliance with 25 this section. 26 Sec. 26. NEW SECTION . 124F.9 Retail marijuana establishment 27 licensure. 28 1. Local jurisdictions may adopt and enforce regulations 29 for retail marijuana establishments that are at least as 30 restrictive as the provisions of this subchapter and any rule 31 promulgated pursuant to this subchapter. 32 2. A retail marijuana establishment shall not operate 33 until the retail marijuana establishment is licensed by the 34 division pursuant to this subchapter and approved by the 35 -15- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 15/ 50 H.F. 2206 relevant local jurisdiction. If an application is denied by 1 the local licensing authority, the division shall revoke the 2 state license. In connection with a license, the applicant 3 shall provide a complete and accurate application as required 4 by the division. 5 3. A retail marijuana establishment shall notify the 6 division in writing of the name, address, and date of birth of 7 a new owner, officer, or manager before the new owner, officer, 8 or manager begins managing, owning, working, or otherwise 9 associating with the establishment. The owner, officer, 10 manager, or employee shall pass a fingerprint-based criminal 11 history record check as required by the division and shall 12 obtain the required identification prior to managing, owning, 13 working, or otherwise associating with the establishment. 14 The division shall not deny licensure to a retail marijuana 15 establishment on the basis that an owner, officer, manager, 16 or employee has been convicted of a crime other than a 17 violent crime, as defined in section 915.10, if the person has 18 completed any term of probation or parole imposed by the court. 19 4. Before granting a state license, the division may 20 consider, except when this subchapter specifically provides 21 otherwise, the requirements of this subchapter and any 22 rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter, and all other 23 reasonable restrictions that are or may be placed upon a 24 licensee by the division or local licensing authority. 25 5. a. Each license issued under this subchapter is separate 26 and distinct. It is unlawful for a person to exercise any 27 of the privileges granted under a license other than the 28 license that the person holds or for a licensee to allow any 29 other person to exercise the privileges granted under the 30 licenseeâs license. A separate license shall be required for 31 each specific business or business entity and each geographical 32 location. 33 b. At all times, a licensee shall possess and maintain 34 possession of the premises for which the license is issued 35 -16- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 16/ 50 H.F. 2206 through ownership, lease, rental, or other arrangement for 1 possession of the premises. 2 6. Each licensee shall manage the licensed premises 3 personally or employ a separate and distinct manager on 4 the premises and shall report the name of the manager to 5 the division and local licensing authority. The licensee 6 shall report any change in manager to the division and local 7 licensing authority within seven days after the change. 8 Sec. 27. NEW SECTION . 124F.10 License renewal. 9 1. Ninety days prior to the expiration date of an existing 10 license, the division shall notify a licensee of the expiration 11 date by first class mail at the licenseeâs address of record 12 with the division. A licensee may apply for the renewal of 13 an existing license to the division not less than thirty days 14 prior to the date of expiration of the existing license. Upon 15 receipt of an application for renewal of an existing license 16 and any applicable fees, the division shall submit, within 17 seven days of the application, a copy of the application to 18 the local jurisdiction to determine whether the application 19 complies with all local restrictions on renewal of licenses. 20 The division shall not accept an application for renewal of a 21 license after the date of expiration, except as provided in 22 subsection 3. The division may extend the expiration date of 23 the license and accept a late application for renewal of a 24 license if the applicant has filed a timely renewal application 25 with the local licensing authority. The division or the local 26 licensing authority, in its discretion, and subject to the 27 requirements of this subsection and subsection 3 and based upon 28 reasonable grounds, may waive the thirty-day time requirements 29 set forth in this subsection. 30 2. The division may request additional fingerprints from a 31 licensee when there is a demonstrated investigative need. 32 3. a. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, 33 a licensee whose license has been expired for not more than 34 ninety days may file a late renewal application upon the 35 -17- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 17/ 50 H.F. 2206 payment of a nonrefundable late application fee of five hundred 1 dollars to the division. A licensee who files a late renewal 2 application and pays the requisite fees may continue to operate 3 until the division takes final action to approve or deny 4 the licenseeâs late renewal application unless the division 5 summarily suspends the license pursuant to chapter 17A, this 6 subchapter, and rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter. 7 b. The division may administratively continue a license 8 and accept a later application for renewal of a license at the 9 discretion of the division. 10 Sec. 28. NEW SECTION . 124F.11 Classes of licenses. 11 For the purpose of regulating the cultivation, manufacture, 12 distribution, sale, and testing of retail marijuana and retail 13 marijuana products, the division in its discretion, upon 14 receipt of an application in the prescribed form, may issue and 15 grant to the applicant a license or registration in any of the 16 following classes, subject to the provisions and restrictions 17 provided by this subchapter: 18 1. Retail marijuana store license. 19 2. Retail marijuana cultivation facility license. 20 3. Retail marijuana products manufacturing license. 21 4. Occupational licenses and registrations for owners, 22 managers, operators, employees, contractors, and other support 23 staff employed by, working in, or having access to restricted 24 areas of the licensed premises, as determined by the division. 25 The division may take any action with respect to a registration 26 pursuant to this subchapter as it may with respect to a license 27 pursuant to this subchapter, in accordance with the procedures 28 established pursuant to this subchapter. 29 5. Retail marijuana transporter license. 30 Sec. 29. NEW SECTION . 124F.12 Retail marijuana store 31 license. 32 1. a. A retail marijuana store license shall be issued 33 by the division only to a person selling retail marijuana or 34 retail marijuana products pursuant to the terms and conditions 35 -18- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 18/ 50 H.F. 2206 of this subchapter. 1 b. A retail marijuana store shall not accept any retail 2 marijuana purchased from a retail marijuana cultivation 3 facility unless the retail marijuana store is provided with 4 evidence that any applicable excise tax due was paid. 5 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a 6 retail marijuana store licensee may also sell retail marijuana 7 products that are prepackaged and labeled as required by rules 8 of the division pursuant to section 124F.21. 9 3. a. A retail marijuana store shall not sell more than one 10 ounce of retail marijuana or its equivalent in retail marijuana 11 products, including retail marijuana concentrate, except for 12 nonedible, nonpsychoactive retail marijuana products, including 13 ointments, lotions, balms, and other nontransdermal topical 14 products to a person. 15 b. (1) Prior to initiating a sale, an employee of the 16 retail marijuana store making the sale shall verify that 17 the purchaser has a valid identification card showing the 18 purchaser is twenty-one years of age or older. If a person 19 under twenty-one years of age presents fraudulent proof of age, 20 any action relying on the fraudulent proof of age shall not be 21 grounds for the revocation or suspension of any license issued 22 under this subchapter. 23 (2) (a) If a retail marijuana store licensee or 24 employee has reasonable cause to believe that a person is 25 under twenty-one years of age and is exhibiting fraudulent 26 proof of age in an attempt to obtain any retail marijuana 27 or cannabis-infused product, the licensee or employee is 28 authorized to confiscate such fraudulent proof of age, if 29 possible, and shall, within seventy-two hours after the 30 confiscation, remit such fraudulent proof of age to a state 31 or local law enforcement agency. The failure to confiscate 32 such fraudulent proof of age or to remit such fraudulent proof 33 of age to a state or local law enforcement agency within 34 seventy-two hours after the confiscation shall not constitute a 35 -19- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 19/ 50 H.F. 2206 criminal offense. 1 (b) If a retail marijuana store licensee or employee 2 believes that a person is under twenty-one years of age and 3 presents fraudulent proof of age in an attempt to obtain any 4 retail marijuana or retail cannabis-infused product, the 5 licensee or employee or any peace officer or police officer, 6 acting in good faith and upon probable cause based upon 7 reasonable grounds therefor, may detain and question such 8 person in a reasonable manner for the purpose of ascertaining 9 whether the person is guilty of any unlawful act regarding the 10 purchase of retail marijuana. The questioning of a person by a 11 licensee, employee, peace officer, or police officer does not 12 render the licensee, employee, peace officer, or police officer 13 civilly or criminally liable for slander, false arrest, false 14 imprisonment, malicious prosecution, or unlawful detention. 15 4. All retail marijuana and retail marijuana products 16 sold at a licensed retail marijuana store shall be packaged 17 and labeled as required by rules of the division pursuant to 18 section 124F.21. 19 5. a. A licensed retail marijuana store shall only 20 sell retail marijuana, retail marijuana products, marijuana 21 accessories, nonconsumable products such as apparel, and 22 marijuana-related products such as childproof packaging 23 containers, but shall be prohibited from selling or giving 24 away any consumable product, including but not limited to 25 cigarettes, alcohol, or an edible product that does not contain 26 marijuana, including but not limited to sodas, candies, or 27 baked goods. 28 b. A licensed retail marijuana store shall not sell any 29 retail marijuana or retail marijuana products that contain 30 nicotine or alcohol, if the sale of the alcohol would require a 31 license pursuant to chapter 123. 32 c. A licensed retail marijuana store shall not sell retail 33 marijuana or retail marijuana products over the internet nor 34 deliver retail marijuana or retail marijuana products to a 35 -20- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 20/ 50 H.F. 2206 person who is not physically present in the retail marijuana 1 storeâs licensed premises. 2 6. Retail marijuana or retail marijuana products shall not 3 be consumed on the premises of a retail marijuana store. 4 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, sales 5 of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products are not 6 exempt from state or local sales tax. 7 8. The division shall not issue more than one retail 8 marijuana store license per county, except that the division 9 may, upon receipt of a petition, issue one additional retail 10 marijuana store license per one hundred thousand population 11 in the county according to the most recent federal decennial 12 census. 13 9. A retail marijuana store may also be licensed as a 14 medical cannabis dispensary pursuant to chapter 124E. The 15 division shall, in consultation with the department of public 16 health, adopt rules for the implementation of this subsection. 17 Sec. 30. NEW SECTION . 124F.13 Retail marijuana cultivation 18 facility license. 19 1. A retail marijuana cultivation facility license shall 20 be issued by the division only to a person who cultivates 21 retail marijuana for sale and distribution to licensed retail 22 marijuana stores, retail marijuana products manufacturing 23 licensees, or other retail marijuana cultivation facilities. 24 2. A retail marijuana cultivation facility shall remit any 25 applicable excise tax due. 26 3. A retail marijuana cultivation facility shall track 27 the marijuana it cultivates from seed or immature plant to 28 wholesale purchase of the retail marijuana. Prior to delivery 29 of any retail marijuana that is sold, the retail marijuana 30 cultivation facility shall provide evidence that the facility 31 paid any applicable excise tax on the retail marijuana due. 32 4. A retail marijuana cultivation facility may provide, 33 except as required by section 124F.21, a sample of its products 34 to the state hygienic laboratory for testing and research 35 -21- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 21/ 50 H.F. 2206 purposes. A retail marijuana cultivation facility shall 1 maintain a record of the sample provided to the state hygienic 2 laboratory and the testing results. 3 5. Retail marijuana or retail marijuana products shall not 4 be consumed on the premises of a retail marijuana cultivation 5 facility. 6 Sec. 31. NEW SECTION . 124F.14 Retail marijuana products 7 manufacturing license. 8 1. a. A retail marijuana products manufacturing license 9 shall be issued by the division to a person who manufactures 10 retail marijuana products pursuant to the terms and conditions 11 of this subchapter. 12 b. A retail marijuana products manufacturer may cultivate 13 its own retail marijuana if the manufacturer obtains a retail 14 marijuana cultivation facility license, or it may purchase 15 retail marijuana from a licensed retail marijuana cultivation 16 facility. A retail marijuana products manufacturer shall track 17 all of its retail marijuana from the point the retail marijuana 18 is either transferred from its retail marijuana cultivation 19 facility or from the point when the retail marijuana is 20 delivered to the retail marijuana products manufacturer from a 21 licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility to the point of 22 transfer to a licensed retail marijuana store. 23 c. A retail marijuana products manufacturer shall not 24 accept any retail marijuana purchased from a retail marijuana 25 cultivation facility unless the retail marijuana products 26 manufacturer is provided with evidence that any applicable 27 excise tax due was paid. 28 2. All retail marijuana products shall be prepared on 29 a licensed premises used exclusively for the manufacture 30 and preparation of retail marijuana or retail marijuana 31 products and using equipment that is used exclusively for the 32 manufacture and preparation of retail marijuana products; 33 except that, if permitted by the local jurisdiction, a 34 retail marijuana products manufacturing licensee may share 35 -22- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 22/ 50 H.F. 2206 the same premises as a medical cannabidiol-infused products 1 manufacturing licensee so long as a virtual or physical 2 separation of inventory is maintained pursuant to rules 3 promulgated by the division. 4 3. All licensed premises on which retail marijuana products 5 are manufactured shall meet the sanitary standards for retail 6 marijuana product preparation promulgated pursuant to section 7 124F.21. 8 4. Retail marijuana or retail marijuana products shall not 9 be consumed on the premises of a retail marijuana products 10 manufacturing facility. 11 5. A retail marijuana products manufacturer may provide, 12 except as required by section 124F.21, a sample of its products 13 to the state hygienic laboratory for testing and research 14 purposes. A retail marijuana products manufacturer shall 15 maintain a record of what was provided to the state hygienic 16 laboratory and the results of the testing. 17 6. A licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer shall 18 package and label each product manufactured as required by 19 rules of the division pursuant to section 124F.21. 20 7. All retail marijuana products that require refrigeration 21 to prevent spoilage must be stored and transported in a 22 refrigerated environment. 23 Sec. 32. NEW SECTION . 124F.15 Retail marijuana use ââ 24 protections. 25 1. No person shall be subject to arrest, prosecution, or 26 penalty in any manner, or be denied any right or privilege, 27 including but not limited to disciplinary action by a business, 28 occupational, or professional licensing board, solely for 29 conduct permitted under this subchapter. 30 2. a. Except as provided in this section, neither the state 31 nor any of its political subdivisions shall impose any penalty 32 or deny any benefit or entitlement for conduct permitted 33 under this subchapter or for the presence of cannabinoids or 34 cannabinoid metabolites in the urine, blood, saliva, breath, 35 -23- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 23/ 50 H.F. 2206 hair, or other tissue or fluid of a person who is twenty-one 1 years of age or older. 2 b. Except as provided in this section and section 321J.2C, 3 neither the state nor any of its political subdivisions 4 shall deny a driverâs license, a professional license, 5 housing assistance, social services, or other benefits based 6 on marijuana use or for the presence of cannabinoids or 7 cannabinoid metabolites in the urine, blood, saliva, breath, 8 hair, or other tissue or fluid of a person who is twenty-one 9 years of age or older. 10 3. No person shall be denied custody of or visitation with a 11 minor for acting in accordance with this subchapter, unless the 12 personâs behavior creates an unreasonable danger to the minor 13 that can be clearly articulated and substantiated. 14 4. Except as provided in this section, neither the state 15 nor any of its political subdivisions shall deny employment 16 or a contract to a person for engaging in conduct permitted 17 under this subchapter, for a prior conviction for a nonviolent 18 marijuana offense that does not involve distribution to minors, 19 or for testing positive for the presence of cannabinoids or 20 cannabinoid metabolites in the urine, blood, saliva, breath, 21 hair, or other tissue or fluid of the individualâs body. 22 5. For the purposes of medical care, including organ and 23 tissue transplants, the use of marijuana does not constitute 24 the use of an illicit substance or otherwise disqualify a 25 person from needed medical care and may only be considered with 26 respect to evidence-based clinical criteria. 27 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 28 contrary, unless there is a specific finding that the 29 individualâs use, cultivation, or possession of marijuana could 30 create a danger to the individual or another person, it shall 31 not be a violation of conditions of parole, probation, or 32 pretrial release to do any of the following: 33 a. Engage in conduct allowed by this subchapter. 34 b. Test positive for marijuana, delta-9 35 -24- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 24/ 50 H.F. 2206 tetrahydrocannabinol, or any other cannabinoid or metabolite of 1 marijuana, except as provided in section 321J.2C. 2 7. a. This section does not prevent a governmental employer 3 from disciplining an employee or contractor for ingesting 4 marijuana in the workplace or for working while under the 5 influence of marijuana. 6 b. The protections provided by this section do not apply to 7 the extent that they conflict with a governmental employerâs 8 obligations under federal law or regulations or to the extent 9 that they would disqualify the entity from a monetary or 10 licensing-related benefit under federal law or regulations. 11 c. This section does not authorize any person to engage in, 12 and does not prevent the imposition of any civil, criminal, 13 discipline, or other penalties, including discipline or 14 termination by a governmental employer, any task while under 15 the influence of marijuana, when doing so would constitute 16 negligence or professional malpractice. 17 Sec. 33. NEW SECTION . 124F.16 Discipline. 18 In addition to any other sanctions prescribed by this 19 subchapter or rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter, the 20 division has the power, on its own motion or upon complaint, 21 after investigation and opportunity for a public hearing at 22 which a licensee must be afforded an opportunity to be heard, 23 to fine a licensee or to suspend or revoke a license issued by 24 the division for a violation by the licensee or by any of the 25 agents or employees of the licensee of the provisions of this 26 subchapter, or any of the rules promulgated pursuant to this 27 subchapter, or of any of the terms, conditions, or provisions 28 of the license issued by the division. The division has the 29 power to administer oaths and issue subpoenas to require the 30 presence of persons and the production of papers, books, and 31 records necessary to the determination of a hearing that the 32 division is authorized to conduct. The division shall conduct 33 a contested case pursuant to chapter 17A prior to imposing 34 discipline, except in the case of an emergency adjudication. 35 -25- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 25/ 50 H.F. 2206 Sec. 34. NEW SECTION . 124F.17 Disposition of seized 1 materials. 2 1. This section shall apply in addition to any criminal, 3 civil, or administrative penalties and in addition to any 4 other penalties prescribed by this subchapter or any rules 5 promulgated pursuant to this subchapter. 6 2. A state or local agency shall not be required to 7 cultivate or care for any retail marijuana or retail marijuana 8 product belonging to or seized from a licensee. A state or 9 local agency shall not be authorized to sell marijuana or 10 retail marijuana. 11 3. If the division issues a final order imposing a 12 disciplinary action against a licensee pursuant to section 13 124F.16, then, in addition to any other remedies, the 14 divisionâs final order may specify that some or all of the 15 licenseeâs marijuana or marijuana product is not retail 16 marijuana or a retail marijuana product and is an illegal 17 controlled substance. The final order may further specify that 18 the licensee shall lose any interest in any of the marijuana or 19 marijuana product even if the marijuana or marijuana product 20 previously qualified as retail marijuana or a retail marijuana 21 product. 22 4. On or before January 1, 2027, the division shall adopt 23 rules governing the implementation of this section. 24 Sec. 35. NEW SECTION . 124F.18 Inspection procedures. 25 1. A licensee shall keep a complete set of all records 26 necessary to show fully the business transactions of the 27 licensee, all of which shall be accessible at all times during 28 business hours for inspection and examination by the division 29 or its authorized representatives. The division may require 30 a licensee to furnish such information as necessary for the 31 proper administration of this subchapter and may require an 32 audit to be made of the books of account and records on such 33 occasions as necessary by an auditor selected by the division 34 who shall have access to all books and records of the licensee. 35 -26- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 26/ 50 H.F. 2206 All associated expenses shall be paid by the licensee. 1 2. Any licensed premises, including any places of storage 2 where retail marijuana or retail marijuana products are stored, 3 cultivated, sold, dispensed, or tested shall be subject to 4 inspection by the state or local jurisdictions and their 5 investigators, during all business hours and during other times 6 when employees are present, for the purpose of inspection 7 or investigation. Access shall be required during business 8 hours for examination of any inventory or books and records 9 required to be kept by the licensees. If any part of the 10 licensed premises consists of a locked area, upon demand to 11 the licensee, such area shall be made available for inspection 12 without delay, and, upon request by authorized representatives 13 of the state or local jurisdiction, the licensee shall open the 14 area for inspection. 15 3. A licensee shall retain all books and records necessary 16 to show fully the business transactions of the licensee for 17 a period of the current tax year and the three immediately 18 preceding tax years. 19 Sec. 36. NEW SECTION . 124F.19 Marijuana excise tax. 20 1. An excise tax is imposed on consumers at the rate of ten 21 percent of the sales price of each sale of retail marijuana and 22 retail marijuana products. 23 2. The tax imposed by this section shall be paid by the 24 consumer to the retail marijuana establishment. Each retail 25 marijuana establishment shall collect from the consumer the 26 full amount of the tax payable on each taxable sale. 27 3. On the fifteenth day of each month, each retail marijuana 28 establishment that sells retail marijuana to a consumer shall 29 pay the excise taxes due on the retail marijuana that the 30 retail marijuana establishment sold in the previous calendar 31 month to the division. 32 Sec. 37. NEW SECTION . 124F.20 Occupational licensing ââ 33 protections. 34 1. A person holding a professional or occupational license 35 -27- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 27/ 50 H.F. 2206 shall not be subject to professional discipline for providing 1 advice or services related to retail marijuana establishments 2 or applications to operate retail marijuana establishments on 3 the basis that marijuana is illegal under federal law. 4 2. An applicant for a professional or occupational license 5 shall not be denied a license based on previous employment 6 related to retail marijuana establishments operating in 7 accordance with state law. 8 Sec. 38. NEW SECTION . 124F.21 Rulemaking. 9 1. The division shall, within one year of the effective 10 date of this Act, adopt rules for the implementation of 11 this subchapter. The rules shall not prohibit the operation 12 of retail marijuana establishments or require such a high 13 investment of risk, money, time, or other resource or asset 14 that the operation of a retail marijuana establishment is not 15 worthy of being carried out in practice by a reasonably prudent 16 businessperson. Such rules shall include all of the following: 17 a. Procedures for the issuance, renewal, suspension, and 18 revocation of a registration to operate a retail marijuana 19 establishment, subject to chapter 17A. 20 b. A schedule of reasonable application, registration, 21 and renewal fees, provided application fees shall not exceed 22 five thousand dollars, with this upper limit adjusted annually 23 for inflation, unless the division determines a greater fee 24 is necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this 25 subchapter. Fees shall be collected by the division and used 26 to administer this subchapter. 27 c. Qualifications for registration that are directly and 28 demonstrably related to the operation of a retail marijuana 29 establishment and that may not disqualify applicants solely for 30 marijuana offenses prior to the effective date of this Act. 31 d. Security requirements. 32 e. Requirements for the transportation and storage of retail 33 marijuana and retail marijuana products by retail marijuana 34 establishments. 35 -28- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 28/ 50 H.F. 2206 f. Requirements for the delivery of retail marijuana and 1 retail marijuana products to consumers, including a prohibition 2 on business names, logos, and other identifying language or 3 images on delivery vehicles and a prohibition on delivering 4 retail marijuana and retail marijuana products to any address 5 located on land owned by the federal government or any address 6 on land or in a building leased by the federal government. 7 g. Employment and training requirements, including 8 requiring that each retail marijuana establishment create 9 an identification badge for each employee or agent. These 10 requirements shall not disqualify applicants solely for 11 marijuana offenses prior to the effective date of this Act. 12 h. Requirements designed to prevent the sale or diversion of 13 retail marijuana and retail marijuana products to persons under 14 the age of twenty-one. 15 i. Requirements for retail marijuana and retail 16 marijuana products sold or distributed by a retail marijuana 17 establishment, including prohibiting any misleading labeling 18 and requiring retail marijuana product labels to include all 19 of the following: 20 (1) The length of time it typically takes for the product 21 to take effect. 22 (2) A disclosure of ingredients and possible allergens. 23 (3) A nutritional fact panel. 24 (4) Requiring opaque, child resistant packaging, which must 25 be designed or constructed to be significantly difficult for 26 children under five years of age to open and not difficult for 27 adults to use properly as defined by 16 C.F.R. Â§1700.20. 28 (5) Requiring that edible retail marijuana products be 29 clearly identifiable, when practicable, with a standard symbol 30 indicating the retail marijuana product contains marijuana. 31 j. Health and safety regulations and standards for the 32 manufacture of retail marijuana products and both the indoor 33 and outdoor cultivation of retail marijuana by retail marijuana 34 establishments. 35 -29- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 29/ 50 H.F. 2206 k. Restrictions on advertising, marketing, and signage 1 including but not limited to a prohibition on mass-market 2 campaigns that have a high likelihood of reaching minors. 3 l. Rules to create at least six tiers of retail marijuana 4 cultivation facilities, based on the size of the facility or 5 the number of plants cultivated, and whether the cultivation 6 occurs outdoors, indoors, or in a greenhouse. Security 7 regulations and licensing fees must vary based on the size of 8 the cultivation facility. 9 m. Restrictions or prohibitions on additives in retail 10 marijuana and retail marijuana-infused products, including but 11 not limited to those that are toxic or designed to make the 12 product more addictive. 13 n. Prohibitions on products that are designed to make the 14 product more appealing to children, including prohibiting the 15 use of any images designed or likely to appeal to minors, 16 including cartoons, toys, animals, or children, and any other 17 images, characters, or phrases that are popularly used to 18 advertise to children. 19 o. Restrictions on the use of pesticides that are injurious 20 to human health. 21 p. Rules governing visits to retail marijuana cultivation 22 facilities and retail marijuana product manufacturing 23 facilities, including requiring the retail marijuana 24 establishment to log visitors. 25 q. A definition of the amount of delta-9 26 tetrahydrocannabinol that constitutes a single serving 27 in a retail marijuana product. 28 r. Standards for the safe manufacture of marijuana extracts 29 and concentrates. 30 s. Requirements that educational materials be disseminated 31 to consumers who purchase retail marijuana-infused products. 32 t. Requirements for random sample testing to ensure quality 33 control, including by ensuring that retail marijuana and 34 retail marijuana-infused products are accurately labeled for 35 -30- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 30/ 50 H.F. 2206 potency. Unless the division determines that remediation or 1 treatment is sufficient to ensure product safety, the testing 2 analysis must include testing for residual solvents, poisons, 3 or toxins; harmful chemicals; dangerous molds or mildew; filth; 4 and harmful microbials such as E. coli or salmonella and 5 pesticides. 6 u. Standards for the operation of marijuana testing 7 facilities, including requirements for equipment and 8 qualifications for personnel. 9 v. Civil penalties for the failure to comply with rules 10 adopted pursuant to this subchapter. Civil penalties shall 11 be collected by the division and used to administer this 12 subchapter. 13 w. Procedures for collecting taxes levied on retail 14 marijuana establishments. 15 x. Requirements for on-site consumption establishments, 16 including for security, ventilation, odor control, and 17 consumption by patrons. These rules may include a prohibition 18 on smoking indoors. 19 y. Requirements for the verification of licensure in 20 transactions between licensees. 21 2. After consultation with researchers knowledgeable 22 about the risks and benefits of marijuana and providing an 23 opportunity for public comment, the division shall develop a 24 scientifically accurate safety information label or handout 25 or both, which shall be available to each adult-use marijuana 26 consumer. The label or handout shall include all of the 27 following: 28 a. Advice about the potential risks of marijuana, including 29 all of the following: 30 (1) The risks of driving under the influence of marijuana, 31 and the fact that doing so is illegal. 32 (2) Any adverse effects unique to younger adults, including 33 related to the developing mind. 34 (3) Potential adverse events and other risks. 35 -31- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 31/ 50 H.F. 2206 (4) The risks of using marijuana during pregnancy and 1 breastfeeding. 2 b. The need to safeguard all retail marijuana and retail 3 marijuana products from children and pets. 4 3. The division shall review and update the safety 5 information materials at least once every two years to 6 ensure they remain accurate. The review period shall include 7 soliciting input from researchers knowledgeable about the 8 risks and benefits of marijuana and an opportunity for public 9 comment. 10 4. In order to ensure that individual privacy is protected, 11 the division shall not require a consumer to provide a 12 retail marijuana store with personal information other than 13 government-issued identification to determine the consumerâs 14 age, and a retail marijuana store shall not be required to 15 acquire and record personal information about consumers. 16 Sec. 39. NEW SECTION . 124F.22 Marijuana use by minors ââ 17 prohibited. 18 Nothing in this subchapter allows the transfer of marijuana, 19 with or without remuneration, to a person under the age of 20 twenty-one years, or the use of marijuana by a person under the 21 age of twenty-one years. 22 Sec. 40. NEW SECTION . 124F.23 Private property and tenant 23 rights. 24 1. Except as provided in this section, the provisions of 25 this subchapter do not require any person, corporation, or any 26 other entity that occupies, owns, or controls a property to 27 allow the consumption, cultivation, display, sale, or transfer 28 of marijuana on or in that property. 29 2. a. Except as provided in this section, a landlord 30 or property manager shall not refuse to rent to a tenant 31 or otherwise discriminate against a tenant based on a past 32 conviction for a marijuana offense that would have been legal 33 under this chapter. 34 b. Except as provided in this section, in the case of 35 -32- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 32/ 50 H.F. 2206 the rental of a residential dwelling, a landlord or property 1 manager shall not prohibit the possession of retail marijuana 2 or medical cannabis, as defined in section 124E.2, or the 3 consumption of retail marijuana or medical cannabis, as defined 4 in section 124E.2, by nonsmoking means. 5 c. The limitations in this subsection do not apply in any 6 of the following circumstances: 7 (1) The tenant is a roomer who is not leasing the entire 8 residential dwelling. 9 (2) The residence is incidental to detention or the 10 provision of medical, geriatric, educational, counseling, 11 religious, or similar services. 12 (3) The residence is a transitional housing or sober living 13 facility. 14 (4) Failing to prohibit marijuana possession or consumption 15 would violate federal law or regulations or cause a landlord 16 or property manager to lose a monetary or licensing-related 17 benefit under federal law or regulations. 18 d. After a warning, a landlord or property manager may take 19 action against a tenant if the tenantâs use of marijuana or 20 medical cannabis, as defined in section 124E.2, creates an 21 odor that interferes with a personâs peaceful enjoyment of the 22 personâs home or property. 23 Sec. 41. NEW SECTION . 124F.24 Apportionment of revenue. 24 Revenues generated by the marijuana excise tax shall be 25 deposited as follows: 26 1. Thirty-five percent in the community reinvestment fund 27 created pursuant to section 124F.25. 28 2. Thirty-two and one-half percent in the mental health 29 services and substance use disorder prevention fund created 30 pursuant to section 124F.26. 31 3. Thirty-two and one-half percent in the local public 32 safety fund created pursuant to section 124F.27. 33 Sec. 42. NEW SECTION . 124F.25 Community reinvestment fund. 34 1. A community reinvestment fund is created under 35 -33- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 33/ 50 H.F. 2206 the control of the division. Moneys in the fund shall be 1 appropriated by the general assembly as provided in subsection 2 2. 3 2. Moneys in the community reinvestment fund shall 4 be appropriated exclusively for the purpose of funding 5 scholarships for Iowa students for two years of postsecondary 6 education at Iowa schools. 7 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 8 or earnings on moneys deposited in the community reinvestment 9 fund shall be credited to the community reinvestment fund. 10 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys credited to the community 11 reinvestment fund shall not revert at the close of a fiscal 12 year. 13 Sec. 43. NEW SECTION . 124F.26 Mental health services and 14 substance use disorder prevention fund. 15 1. A mental health services and substance use disorder 16 prevention fund is created under the control of the division. 17 Moneys in the fund shall be appropriated by the general 18 assembly as provided in subsection 2. 19 2. Moneys in the mental health services and substance use 20 disorder prevention fund shall be appropriated exclusively for 21 the purposes of providing mental health services and preventing 22 substance use disorders. 23 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 24 earnings on moneys deposited in the mental health services and 25 substance use disorder prevention fund shall be credited to the 26 mental health services and substance use disorder prevention 27 fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys credited to the 28 mental health services and substance use disorder prevention 29 fund shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year. 30 Sec. 44. NEW SECTION . 124F.27 Local public safety fund. 31 1. A local public safety fund is created under the control 32 of the division. Moneys in the fund shall be appropriated by 33 the general assembly as provided in subsection 2. 34 2. Moneys in the local public safety fund shall be 35 -34- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 34/ 50 H.F. 2206 appropriated exclusively for the purposes of supporting local 1 law enforcement personnel, fire department personnel, and 2 emergency medical personnel in municipalities. 3 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 4 or earnings on moneys deposited in the local public safety 5 fund shall be credited to the local public safety fund. 6 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys credited to the local 7 public safety fund shall not revert at the close of a fiscal 8 year. 9 Sec. 45. NEW SECTION . 332.1 Definitions. 10 1. âDepartmentâ means the department of revenue. 11 2. âDirectorâ means the director of the department of 12 revenue. 13 3. âRetail marijuanaâ means the same as defined in section 14 124F.4. 15 4. âRetail marijuana storeâ means the same as defined in 16 section 124F.4. 17 5. âRetail saleâ means the same as defined in section 423.1. 18 6. âSurchargeâ means a retail marijuana surcharge imposed 19 pursuant to this chapter. 20 Sec. 46. NEW SECTION . 332.2 Retail marijuana surcharge. 21 1. A surcharge may be imposed, in accordance with the 22 provisions of this section, by ordinance of the board of 23 supervisors of a county that has not prohibited the sale of 24 retail marijuana. The surcharge shall be imposed at a rate of 25 one percent upon the retail sales price of retail marijuana. 26 2. The surcharge shall be in addition to the state sales tax 27 imposed pursuant to chapter 423, subchapter II, and the local 28 sales and services tax imposed pursuant to chapter 423B. 29 3. a. Within ten days of the passage of an ordinance 30 imposing a surcharge, the county auditor shall give written 31 notice to the director by sending a copy of the ordinance to 32 the director. 33 b. A surcharge shall be imposed either January 1 or July 1 34 following the notification of the director but not sooner than 35 -35- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 35/ 50 H.F. 2206 ninety days following the passage of the ordinance imposing the 1 surcharge and not sooner than sixty days following notice to 2 sellers, as defined in section 423.1. 3 c. A surcharge shall be repealed only on June 30 or December 4 31 but not sooner than ninety days following repeal of the 5 ordinance. At least forty days before the repeal of the 6 surcharge, the board of supervisors shall provide notice of the 7 action by certified mail to the director of revenue. 8 4. Upon the remittance of the revenues from the state 9 surcharge revenue fund to each county that has imposed a retail 10 marijuana surcharge under section 332.4, the revenues shall be 11 deposited into the general fund of the county. 12 Sec. 47. NEW SECTION . 332.3 Administration of surcharge. 13 1. The director shall administer the surcharge imposed 14 pursuant to this chapter as nearly as possible in conjunction 15 with the administration of state sales tax laws. The director 16 shall provide appropriate forms, or provide space on the 17 regular state tax forms, for reporting surcharge liability. 18 2. a. Section 422.25, subsection 4, sections 422.30, 19 422.67, and 422.68, section 422.69, subsection 1, sections 20 422.70, 422.71, 422.72, 422.74, and 422.75, section 423.14, 21 subsection 1, and sections 423.23, 423.24, 423.25, 423.31, 22 423.33, 423.35, 423.37 through 423.42, and 423.47, consistent 23 with the provisions of this chapter, apply with respect to 24 the surcharge authorized under this chapter, in the same 25 manner and with the same effect as retail sales taxes within 26 the meaning of those statutes. The director may require all 27 persons who are engaged in the business of deriving any sales 28 price subject to a surcharge under this chapter to register 29 with the department. All surcharges collected under this 30 chapter are deemed to be held in trust for the state of Iowa and 31 the counties imposing the surcharges. County officials shall 32 confer with the director of revenue for assistance in drafting 33 the ordinance imposing the surcharge. A certified copy of the 34 ordinance shall be filed with the director as soon as possible 35 -36- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 36/ 50 H.F. 2206 after passage. 1 b. Frequency of deposits and quarterly reports of the 2 surcharge with the department of revenue are governed by the 3 provisions in section 423.31. Local surcharge collections 4 shall not be included in computation of the total tax to 5 determine frequency of filing under section 423.31. 6 3. a. The director, in consultation with county officials, 7 shall collect and account for the surcharge. The director 8 shall certify each quarter the amount of the surcharge receipts 9 and any interest and penalties to be credited to the county 10 account in the state surcharge revenue fund established in 11 section 332.4. County authorities shall not require any permit 12 not required by the director of revenue. 13 b. All surcharge revenues and interest and penalties 14 received or refunded one hundred eighty days or more after 15 the date on which the county repeals the surcharge shall be 16 deposited in or withdrawn from the general fund of the state. 17 4. Each county that has imposed a retail marijuana surcharge 18 under this chapter shall assist the department in identifying 19 new establishments required to impose the surcharge in the 20 county. This process shall be ongoing until the surcharge is 21 repealed. 22 Sec. 48. NEW SECTION . 332.4 State surcharge revenue fund 23 ââ county accounts. 24 1. A state surcharge revenue fund is established in the 25 state treasury under the control of the department consisting 26 of the surcharge revenues collected within each county and 27 deposited in the fund pursuant to section 332.3. Revenues 28 deposited in the fund are appropriated to the department for 29 the purposes of this section. 30 2. A county account is created within the fund for each 31 county imposing a retail marijuana surcharge under this 32 chapter. 33 3. The department shall deposit the revenues described in 34 subsection 1 that were collected in a quarter beginning on or 35 -37- LSB 5998YH (3) 91 ss/ko 37/ 50 H.F. 2206 after the imposition of the surcharge into the appropriate 1 county account in the fund. 2 4. All revenues in each county account within the fund 3 shall be remitted quarterly by the department to the county 4 that imposed the retail marijuana surcharge for deposit in the 5 general fund of the county. 6 5. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 7 necessary to administer the departmentâs responsibilities under 8 this chapter. 9 Sec. 49. NEW SECTION . 453B.19 Retail marijuana. 10 This chapter shall not apply to retail marijuana or retail 11 marijuana products produced or sold pursuant to chapter 124F. 12 DIVISION III 13 EFFECTIVE DATE 14 Sec. 50. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 15 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment, except that 16 the division of the department of revenue responsible for 17 issuing alcohol licenses shall not issue a license to operate a 18 retail marijuana establishment prior to January 1, 2027. 19 DIVISION IV 20 CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE 21 Sec. 51. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE ââ SUBCHAPTER DESIGNATIONS. 22 1. The Code editor is directed to create two new subchapters 23 in chapter 124F as follows: 24 a. Subchapter I shall be entitled âCRIMINAL PENALTIESâ and 25 include sections 124F.1 through 124F.3. 26 b. Subchapter II shall be entitled âRETAIL MARIJUANAâ and 27 include sections 124F.4 through 124F.27. 28 2. The Code editor may modify subchapter titles if necessary 29 and is directed to correct internal references in the Code as 30 necessary due to enactment of this section. 31